Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2015
Construction projects; inspection; certification of work performed; payment due.

From time to time the department shall inspect each construction project approved by the Surgeon General and, if the inspection so warrants, the department shall certify to the Surgeon General that work has been performed upon the project, or purchases have been made, in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, and that payment of an installment of federal funds is due to the applicant.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 15, p. 738;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 517.